Hawaii, session 2025, GM1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAW AH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that since 2023, a
working group has been formed to identify and address issues in
the State's guardianship and conservatorship statutory
procedures. This working group is named the "uniform
guardianship, conservatorship, and other protective arrangements
act working group", and it has met regularly in 2024 under the
facilitation of the staff of the Hawaii state council on
developmental disabilities. An important issue identified by
the working group is the accessibility of certain resources that
the court may order for individuals, also statutorily referred
to as respondents, for whom a guardianship or conservatorship is
being sought. The specific services are "kokua kanawai", who
are individuals appointed by the court to review the personal
circumstances of the respondent and provide the court with an
independent assessment of the situation; guardians ad litem, who
are individuals appointed by the court to represent the best
interests of the respondent; and "professional evaluations",
2025-3303 HB648 CDl HMSO
IIIIBMMinilllOIIIMIil

H.B. NO.
^0’
C.D. 1
including but not limited to a psychological evaluation,
neurocognitive evaluation, or functional evaluation, by a
physician, psychologist, or other individual appointed by the
court who is qualified to evaluate the respondent's alleged
impairment.
While the court has the statutory authority to order these
resources, it does not always order them. The information
provided by these resources supplies the court with essential
information to support a court's informed decisions regarding
the capacity and circumstances of respondents. Overall, they
make the procedures surrounding guardianship and conservatorship
more equitable. When respondents do not receive these
resources, it is usually because they do not have the personal
finances to afford them.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a two-
year guardianship- and conservatorship-related court resources
pilot program in the circuit court of the first circuit that
will ensure these resources are available to all respondents.
SECTION 2. (a) There shall be established within the
judiciary a two-year pilot program in the probate court and
family court of the first circuit to fund the following
2025-3303 HB648 CDl HMSO
Hiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiiii

Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
guardianship- and conservatorship-related court resources in
situations where the respondent does not have sufficient funds
to pay for one or more of the resources and the court has deemed
the resource or resources beneficial:
(1) An investigation and report by a kokua kanawai
appointed with the powers and duties pursuant to
section 560:5-305 (c) and (d), Hawaii Revised Statutes,
for guardianships and powers and duties pursuant to
section 560:5-406 (c) and (d), Hawaii Revised Statutes,
for conservatorships;
(2) A guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to section
560:5-115, Hawaii Revised Statutes; and
(3) A professional evaluation of the respondent's alleged
impairment pursuant to section 560:5-306, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, for guardianships or section
560:5-406(f), Hawaii Revised Statutes, for
conservatorships, that includes information as noted
in rule 102, Hawaii probate rules; provided that the
professional evaluation may include but not be limited
to a psychological evaluation, neurocognitive
evaluation, or functional evaluation.
2025-3303 HB648 CDl HMSO 3
mniiiiininnii

Page 4 H.B. NO 648
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(b) The judiciary shall submit a report of its findings
and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the
governor and legislature no later than forty days prior to the
convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027 on the
guardianship- and conservatorship-related court resources pilot
program and include the following information aggregated by each
type of court:
(1) The status of the guardianship- and
conservatorship-related court resources pilot program;
(2) The number of people served by the pilot program;
(3) The number of people who received resources from the
pilot program who otherwise would not have been able
to pay for these resources;
(4) Recommendations as to whether the pilot program should
continue as a pilot program, be made permanent, or be
discontinued; and
(5) If continuation or permanency of the pilot program is
recommended, recommendations for funding for the
program.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000 or so much
2025-3303 HB648 CDl HMSO
liiiiioiuiiiiiiwnii

Page 5 H.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the provision of guardianship- and
conservatorship-related court resources in the first circuit
probate court as part of the pilot program established pursuant
to section 2 of this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary
for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the provision of guardianship- and
conservatorship-related court resources in the first circuit
family court as part of the pilot program established pursuant
to section 2 of this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary
for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3303 HB648 CDl HMSO

H B. NO. ^.1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 648, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K.. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 648, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate